Maryland, session 2026, HB0546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–132.
(A) (1) ON SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE A CONTINUING
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSE ON EDUCATOR WELL–BEING AND
FLOURISHING.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO ALL SCHOOL
PERSONNEL AND ADMINISTRATORS.
(3) THE COURSE MAY BE MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH SYNCHRONOUS
OR ASYNCHRONOUS INSTRUCTION.
(4) TO FULFILL THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) DEVELOP A COURSE;
– 1 –

Ch. 758 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ADAPT AN EXISTING COURSE DEVELOPED BY A THIRD
PARTY; OR
(III) MAKE AVAILABLE AN EXISTING COURSE DEVELOPED BY A
THIRD PARTY.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE A COURSE UNDER THIS
SECTION ONLY IF THE COURSE CAN BE PROVIDED AT NO COST OR AT A COMPARABLE
COST, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, TO THE COST THE DEPARTMENT PAYS
FOR PROVIDING A COMPARABLE COURSE.
(C) THE COURSE A COURSE OFFERED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
MADE AVAILABLE AT A COMPARABLE RATE TO CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT COURSES FOR LICENSED PERSONNEL THAT CONTAIN THE SAME
NUMBER OF PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT POINTS.
(C) (D) (1) THE COURSE A COURSE OFFERED MADE AVAILABLE BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL CONSIST OF INSTRUCTION ON
UNDERSTANDING THE EIGHT DIMENSIONS OF WELL–BEING IDENTIFIED BY THE
FEDERAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ADMINISTRATION
AND APPLYING THOSE LESSONS TO INCREASING THE EDUCATOR’S PERSONAL
WELL–BEING.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(I) SOCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
DIFFERENT TYPES OF RELATIONSHIPS AND BUILDING FRIENDSHIPS AND A SENSE
OF BELONGING AND COMMUNITY;
(II) ENVIRONMENTAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING:
1. THE IMPORTANCE OF A CONNECTION TO NATURE AND
THE OUTDOORS; AND
2. THE IMPORTANCE OF FEELING SAFE TO AN
EDUCATOR’S OVERALL WELL–BEING;
(III) PHYSICAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF A
HEALTHY BODY TO OVERALL WELL–BEING;
(IV) EMOTIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE
OF BEING ABLE TO EXPRESS FEELINGS, ADJUST TO EMOTIONAL CHALLENGES, COPE
WITH LIFE’S STRESSORS, AND ENJOY LIFE;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 758
(V) SPIRITUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
A SENSE OF MEANING, PURPOSE, AND CHARACTER;
(VI) OCCUPATIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF WORK TO AN INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL WELL–BEING;
(VII) INTELLECTUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF BEING ABLE TO KEEP AN ACTIVE BRAIN, CULTIVATE PERSONAL
INTERESTS, AND PURSUE LIFELONG LEARNING; AND
(VIII) FINANCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
UNDERSTANDING FINANCIAL PROCESSES AND FINANCIAL RESOURCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –